Utah statutes.
63M-4-505.    Report to the Legislature.

The office shall report annually to the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee and the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee describing:

(1)  its success in attracting alternative energy projects to the state and the resulting increase in new state revenues under this part;

(2)  the amount of tax credits the office has granted or will grant and the time period during which the tax credits have been or will be granted; and

(3)  the economic impact on the state by comparing new state revenues to tax credits that have been or will be granted under this part.

